Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1472.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MINNESOTA BOARD ON AGING.new text end new text begin $1,995,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,071,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for the Minnesota Board on Aging under Minnesota Statutes, section 256.975, to add: new text end new text begin (1) one full-time equivalent position to ensure compliance with federal regulations and assist with providing updates and technical assistance to the seven area agencies on aging and service providers; new text end new text begin (2) one full-time equivalent position to support compliance and policy development for services under the federal Older Americans Act; new text end new text begin (3) two full-time equivalent positions to better support increased service demands and operational needs of the Senior LinkAge Line; and new text end new text begin (4) 18 additional staff positions for the area agencies on aging contact centers to support Senior LinkAge Line operations. new text end new text begin This appropriation is added to the base. new text end